Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 HF 530 (5) 91 sb/js/md H.F. 530 Section 1. Section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) A person may be issued a permit to carry weapons when 3 the personâs employment in a private investigation business 4 or private security business licensed under chapter 80A , or 5 a personâs employment as a member of the general assembly, 6 peace officer, correctional officer, judicial officer, county 7 attorney, assistant county attorney, attorney general, deputy 8 attorney general, assistant attorney general, security guard, 9 bank messenger or other person transporting property of a value 10 requiring security, or in police work, reasonably justifies 11 that person going armed. 12 Sec. 2. Section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, 13 subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 14 (4) A person may be issued a permit to carry weapons if the 15 person is a member of the general assembly, judicial officer, 16 county attorney , or an assistant county attorney , attorney 17 general, deputy attorney general, or an assistant attorney 18 general . An application for a permit by an assistant county 19 attorney must be approved by the county attorney of each county 20 in which the applicant serves prior to a permit to carry 21 weapons being issued. An application for a permit by a member 22 of the general assembly, attorney general, deputy attorney 23 general, or an assistant attorney general shall be delivered 24 to the sheriff for the county in which the applicant resides. 25 The sheriff of the issuing county may require the applicant to 26 complete a proficiency examination prior to issuing the permit 27 to carry weapons. The standards for a proficiency examination 28 for a member of the general assembly, judicial officer, county 29 attorney , or assistant county attorney , attorney general, 30 deputy attorney general, or an assistant attorney general 31 shall not exceed the standards required of a peace officer. 32 The applicant shall pay the reasonable costs associated with 33 completing a proficiency examination. 34 Sec. 3. Section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraphs b, c, and d, 35 -1- HF 530 (5) 91 sb/js/md 1/ 3 H.F. 530 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 1 b. The permit shall be on a form prescribed and published 2 by the commissioner of public safety, shall identify the 3 holder, and shall state the nature of the employment requiring 4 the holder to go armed. A permit so issued, other than to 5 a member of the general assembly, peace officer, judicial 6 officer, county attorney, or assistant county attorney, 7 attorney general, deputy attorney general, or assistant 8 attorney general, shall authorize the person to whom it is 9 issued to go armed anywhere in the state, only while engaged 10 in the employment, and while going to and from the place of the 11 employment. 12 c. A permit issued to a member of the general assembly, 13 certified peace officer, judicial officer, county attorney, or 14 assistant county attorney , attorney general, deputy attorney 15 general, or assistant attorney general shall authorize that 16 member of the general assembly, peace officer, judicial 17 officer, county attorney, or assistant county attorney , 18 attorney general, deputy attorney general, or assistant 19 attorney general to go armed anywhere in the state at all 20 times, including on the grounds of a school. 21 d. Permits shall expire twelve months after the date 22 when issued except that permits issued to members of the 23 general assembly, peace officers, judicial officers, county 24 attorneys, assistant county attorneys, the attorney general, 25 deputy attorneys general, assistant attorneys general, and 26 correctional officers are valid through the holder of the 27 permitâs period of employment unless otherwise canceled. 28 When the employment is terminated, the holder of the permit 29 shall surrender it the permit to the issuing officer for 30 cancellation. 31 Sec. 4. Section 724.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 32 by adding the following new paragraph: 33 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Notwithstanding any other provision in 34 this section, a person issued a permit to carry weapons under 35 -2- HF 530 (5) 91 sb/js/md 2/ 3 H.F. 530 this section may carry weapons only in a concealed manner when 1 inside a courtroom. This paragraph does not apply to peace 2 officers or correctional officers when fulfilling their duties 3 of employment. 4 Sec. 5. Section 724.6, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 3. For purposes of this section , âemergency medical care 7 providerâ : 8 a. âEmergency medical care providerâ means the same as 9 defined in section 147A.1 . 10 b. âJudicial officerâ means the same as defined in section 11 602.1101. 12 Sec. 6. Section 724.6, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. The supreme court may by rule impose 15 additional training or other requirements on judicial officers 16 who hold a permit issued under this section. 17 -3- HF 530 (5) 91 sb/js/md 3/ 3